Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 19. Gifts to Minors
[Repealed]

§§ 91-19-1 through 91-19-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 416, § 26, eff from and after January 1, 1995.

§91-19-1. [Codes, 1942, § 672-110; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 10]

§91-19-3. [Codes, 1942, § 672-109; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 9]

§91-19-5. [Codes, 1942, § 672-101; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 1]

§91-19-7. [Codes, 1942, § 672-102; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 2]

§91-19-9. [Codes, 1942, § 672-103; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 3; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 3]

§91-19-11. [Codes, 1942, § 672-104; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 4]

§91-19-13. [Codes, 1942, § 672-105; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 5]

§91-19-15. [Codes, 1942, § 672-106; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 6; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 5]

§91-19-17. [Codes, 1942, § 672-107; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 7; Laws, 1971, ch. 505, § 6]

§91-19-19. [Codes, 1942, § 672-108; Laws, 1958, ch. 248, § 8; Laws, 1960, ch. 217 § 9]